Washington statutes.
RCW 8.16.130

Appellate review.

Either party may seek appellate review of the judgment for compensation awarded for the property taken, entered in the superior court, to the supreme court or the court of appeals of the state within sixty days after the entry of the judgment, and such review shall bring before the supreme court or the court of appeals the justness of the compensation awarded for the property taken, and any error occurring on the hearing of such matter, prejudicial to the party appealing: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That if the owner or owners of the land taken accepts the sum awarded by the jury or court, he, she, or they shall be deemed thereby to have waived appellate review.

[ 2011 c 336 s 275; 1988 c 202 s 12; 1971 c 81 s 41; 1909 p 375 s 13; RRS s 918. Prior: 1903 c 111 s 13.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.